Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.8. A. No recommendations to the Governor for
parole shall be made nor any paroles granted by the Pardon and
Parole Board in relation to any inmate in a penal institution in the
State of Oklahoma unless the Pardon and Parole Board considers the
victim impact statements if presented to the jury, or the judge in
the event a jury was waived, at the time of sentencing and, in every
appropriate case, as a condition of parole, monetary restitution of
economic loss, as defined by Section 991f of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, incurred by a victim of the crime for which the
inmate was imprisoned.
Req. No. 15356 Page 1

B. In every case, the Pardon and Parole Board shall first
consider the number of previous felony convictions and the type of
criminal violations leading to any such felony convictions, then
shall consider either suitable employment or a suitable residence,
and finally shall mandate participation in education programs to
achieve the proficiency level established in Section 510.7 of this
title or, at the discretion of the Board require the attainment of a
general education diploma, as a condition for release on parole.
C. The Board shall consider the availability of programs and
the waiting period for such programs in setting conditions of parole
release. The Board may require any program to be completed after
the inmate is released on parole as a condition of parole.
D. A facsimile signature of the inmate on parole papers that is
transmitted to the Board shall be an accepted means of
acknowledgement of parole conditions.
E. The probation and parole officer shall render reasonable
assistance to any person making application for parole, in helping
to obtain suitable employment or enrollment in an education program
or a suitable residence. Any inmate who fails to satisfactorily
attend and make satisfactory progress in the educational program in
which the inmate has been required to participate as a condition of
parole, may have his or her parole revoked. If an inmate's parole
of an inmate is revoked, such inmate shall be returned to
confinement in the custody of the Department of Corrections.
Req. No. 15356 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15356 GRS 01/03/26





















Req. No. 15356 Page 3